Vermont, session 2025-2026, H134.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3757 is amended to read:
§ 3757. LAND USE CHANGE TAX
(a) Land that has been classified as agricultural land or managed forestland
pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a land use change tax upon the
VT LEG #379688 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.134
2025 Page 2 of 3
development of that land, as defined in section 3752 of this chapter. The tax
shall be at the rate of 10 percent of the full fair market value of the changed
land determined without regard to the use value appraisal. If changed land is a
portion of a parcel, the fair market value of the changed land shall be the fair
market value of the changed land as a separate parcel prorated on the basis of
acreage, divided by the common level of appraisal. Such fair market value
shall be determined as of the date the land is no longer eligible for use value
appraisal. This tax shall be in addition to the annual property tax imposed
upon such property. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require
payment of an additional land use change tax upon the subsequent
development of the same land, nor shall it be construed to require payment of a
land use change tax merely because previously eligible land becomes
ineligible, provided no development of the land has occurred.
* * *
(n) Land withdrawn from use value appraisal is exempt from the levy of
land use change tax under this section, provided:
(1) the withdrawn land fronts an existing public road;
(2) the land is withdrawn to develop affordable housing as defined in 24
V.S.A. § 4303(1);
(3) the withdrawn land is part of, or no more than three miles from the
boundary of, a State designated downtown or village center, planned growth
VT LEG #379688 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.134
2025 Page 3 of 3
area, or designated neighborhood as those terms are defined and used under 24
V.S.A. chapter 139; and
(4) the withdrawal does not result in the fragmentation of an existing
parcel.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379688 v.1